Utah statutes.
40-7-2.   Authority for governor to execute extensions or withdraw from
compact.
The governor of the state of Utah is authorized and empowered, for and in the
name of the state of Utah to execute agreements for further extension of the
expiration date of said compact to conserve oil and gas, and to determine if
and when it shall be to the best interest of the state of Utah to withdraw
from said compact upon sixty days' notice as provided by its terms. In the
event that he shall determine that the state shall withdraw from said compact
he shall have the power and authority to give necessary notice and to take any
and all steps necessary and proper to effect the withdrawal of the state of
Utah from said compact.
